Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-767
Act; administration and enforcement;
department; powers and duties; prohibited acts; rules and regulations.

The Anthrax Control Act
shall be administered and enforced by the department. In administering and
enforcing the act:

(1) The department may cooperate
and may contract with any person, including any local, state, or national
organizations, public or private, for the performance of activities required
or authorized pursuant to the act;

(2) The department may employ all general powers provided
in sections 54-701 to 54-705 and 54-742 to 54-753 in administering the act;

(3) For purposes of access
for (a) inspections, (b) tests, including the taking of samples, (c) treatments,
or (d) carrying out and enforcing quarantines, agents and employees of the
department shall have the right to enter upon any premises where livestock
that are infected with or are suspected to be infected with anthrax are located.
It shall be unlawful for any person to interfere in any way with or obstruct
an agent or employee of the department from entering upon such premises for
the purposes stated in this subdivision or to interfere in any way with the
department in such work;

(4)
The department may delegate to appropriate personnel any of the responsibilities
in this section for the proper administration of the act;

(5) The department may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to aid in implementing the act. The rules
and regulations may include, but are not limited to, establishing procedures
for testing, vaccination, quarantine, cleaning and disinfection of affected
premises, carcass disposal, designation of approved laboratories to confirm
the presence of anthrax, submission of specimen samples, and diagnosis and
confirmation of anthrax;

(6)
The department may provide state funds to or on behalf of herd owners for
certain activities or any portion thereof in connection with the implementation
of the act if funds for any activities or any portion thereof have been appropriated
and are available. The department may develop statewide priorities for the
expenditure of state funds available for anthrax control activities; and

(7) Unless the Legislature
appropriates funds to the department specifically for such purposes, the department
shall not pay for (a) costs of gathering, confining, and restraining animals
for vaccination or other anthrax control activities, (b) costs of providing
necessary facilities and assistance, (c) indemnity for any animal destroyed
as a result of being affected with anthrax, or (d) costs for carcass disposal
and any disinfection or cleaning.

Laws 2009, LB99, § 4.